Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.370

Contract requirements—Off-site prefabricated items—Submission of information.

(1) For any public work estimated to cost over one million dollars, the contract must contain a provision requiring the submission of certain information about off-site, prefabricated, nonstandard, project specific items produced under the terms of the contract and produced outside Washington. The information must be submitted to the department of labor and industries under subsection (2) of this section. The information that must be provided is:

(a) The estimated cost of the public works project;

(b) The name of the awarding agency and the title of the public works project;

(c) The contract value of the off-site, prefabricated, nonstandard, project specific items produced outside Washington, including labor and materials; and

(d) The name, address, and federal employer identification number of the contractor that produced the off-site, prefabricated, nonstandard, project specific items.

(2)(a) The required information under this section must be submitted by the contractor or subcontractor as a part of the affidavit of wages paid form filed with the department of labor and industries under RCW 39.12.040. This information is only required to be submitted by the contractor or subcontractor who directly contracted for the off-site, prefabricated, nonstandard, project specific items produced outside Washington.

(b) The department of labor and industries shall include requests for the information about off-site, prefabricated, nonstandard, project specific items produced outside Washington on the affidavit of wages paid form required under RCW 39.12.040.

(c) The department of enterprise services shall develop standard contract language to meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section and make the language available on its website.

(d) Failure to submit the information required in subsection (1) of this section as part of the affidavit of wages paid form does not constitute a violation of RCW 39.12.050.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "off-site, prefabricated, nonstandard, project specific items" means products or items that are: (a) Made primarily of architectural or structural precast concrete, fabricated steel, pipe and pipe systems, or sheet metal and sheet metal duct work; (b) produced specifically for the public work and not considered to be regularly available shelf items; (c) produced or manufactured by labor expended to assemble or modify standard items; and (d) produced at an off-site location.

(4) The department of labor and industries shall transmit information collected under this section to the capital projects advisory review board created in RCW 39.10.220 for review.

(5) This section applies to contracts entered into between September 1, 2010, and December 31, 2013.

(6) This section does not apply to department of transportation public works projects.

(7) This section does not apply to local transportation public works projects.

[ 2015 c 225 s 38; 2010 c 276 s 1.]

NOTES: